Hawaii statutes.
§273-14 Penalty for violating. Any
person violating any bylaw or regulation approved in section 273-13, shall be
fined not more than $25 and costs; and in default of payment, shall be
imprisoned not more than three months. [L 1878, c 29, §25; RL 1925, §901; RL
1935, §1807; RL 1945, §5065; RL 1955, §106-14; HRS §273-14]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next